California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
This article shall be known and may be cited as the Juvenile Crime Enforcement and Accountability Challenge Grant Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 133, Sec. 3.   Effective July 10, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

749.21.

The Juvenile Crime Enforcement and Accountability Challenge Grant Program shall be administered by the Board of Corrections for the purpose of reducing juvenile crime and delinquency. This program shall award grants on a competitive basis following request-for-proposal evaluation standards and guidelines developed by the Board of Corrections, as authorized by this article, to counties that (a) develop and implement a comprehensive, multiagency local action plan that provides for a continuum of responses to juvenile crime and delinquency, including collaborative ways to address local problems of juvenile crime; and (b) demonstrate a collaborative and integrated approach for implementing a system of swift, certain, graduated responses, and appropriate sanctions for at-risk youth and juvenile offenders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

749.22.

To be eligible for this grant, each county shall be required to establish a multiagency juvenile justice coordinating council that shall develop and implement a continuum of county-based responses to juvenile crime. The coordinating councils shall, at a minimum, include the chief probation officer, as chair, and one representative each from the district attorney’s office, the public defender’s office, the sheriff’s department, the board of supervisors, the department of social services, the department of mental health, a community-based drug and alcohol program, a city police department, the county office of education or a school district, and an at-large community representative. In order to carry out its duties pursuant to this section, a coordinating council shall also include representatives from nonprofit community-based organizations providing services to minors. The board of supervisors shall be informed of community-based organizations participating on a coordinating council. The coordinating councils shall develop a comprehensive, multiagency plan that identifies the resources and strategies for providing an effective continuum of responses for the prevention, intervention, supervision, treatment, and incarceration of male and female juvenile offenders, including strategies to develop and implement locally based or regionally based out-of-home placement options for youths who are persons described in Section 602. Counties may utilize community punishment plans developed pursuant to grants awarded from funds included in the 1995 Budget Act to the extent the plans address juvenile crime and the juvenile justice system or local action plans previously developed for this program. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following components:

(a) An assessment of existing law enforcement, probation, education, mental health, health, social services, drug and alcohol and youth services resources which specifically target at-risk juveniles, juvenile offenders, and their families.

(b) An identification and prioritization of the neighborhoods, schools, and other areas in the community that face a significant public safety risk from juvenile crime, such as gang activity, daylight burglary, late-night robbery, vandalism, truancy, controlled substance sales, firearm-related violence, and juvenile alcohol use within the council’s jurisdiction.

(c) A local action plan (LAP) for improving and marshaling the resources set forth in subdivision (a) to reduce the incidence of juvenile crime and delinquency in the areas targeted pursuant to subdivision (b) and the greater community. The councils shall prepare their plans to maximize the provision of collaborative and integrated services of all the resources set forth in subdivision (a), and shall provide specified strategies for all elements of response, including prevention, intervention, suppression, and incapacitation, to provide a continuum for addressing the identified male and female juvenile crime problem, and strategies to develop and implement locally based or regionally based out-of-home placement options for youths who are persons described in Section 602.

(d) Develop information and intelligence-sharing systems to ensure that county actions are fully coordinated, and to provide data for measuring the success of the grantee in achieving its goals. The plan shall develop goals related to the outcome measures that shall be used to determine the effectiveness of the program.

(e) Identify outcome measures which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The rate of juvenile arrests.

(2) The rate of successful completion of probation.

(3) The rate of successful completion of restitution and court-ordered community service responsibilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 500, Sec. 6.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

749.23.

The Board of Corrections shall award grants that provide funding for three years. Funding shall be used to supplement, rather than supplant, existing programs and grants may be awarded to any county including those counties currently receiving funds pursuant to this article. Grant funds shall be used for programs that are identified in the local action plan as part of a continuum of responses to reduce juvenile crime and delinquency. No grant shall be awarded unless the applicant makes available resources in an amount equal to at least 25 percent of the amount of the grant. Resources may include in-kind contributions from participating agencies. In awarding grants, priority shall be given to those proposals which include additional funding that exceeds 25 percent of the amount of the grant. In awarding grants, priority shall also be given to programs in counties where the population exceeds 500,000 and the rate of violent crime exceeds the state average.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 325, Sec. 3.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

749.24.

The Board of Corrections shall establish minimum standards, funding schedules, and procedures for awarding grants, which shall take into consideration, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Size of the eligible high-risk youth population.

(b) Demonstrated ability to administer the program.

(c) Demonstrated ability to provide and develop a continuum of responses to juvenile crime and delinquency that includes prevention, intervention, diversion, suppression, and incapacitation.

(d) Demonstrated ability to implement a plan that provides a collaborative and integrated approach to juvenile crime and delinquency.

(e) Demonstrated history of maximizing federal, state, local, and private funding sources.

(f) Demonstrated efforts to implement a multicounty juvenile justice program.

(g) Likelihood that the program will continue to operate after state grant funding ends.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 133, Sec. 3.   Effective July 10, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

749.25.

The Board of Corrections may award up to a total of two million dollars ($2,000,000) statewide, in individual grants not exceeding one hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), on a competitive basis to counties to assist in establishing a multiagency coordinating group or developing a local action plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 133, Sec. 3.   Effective July 10, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

749.26.

The Board of Corrections shall create an evaluation design for the Juvenile Crime Enforcement and Accountability Challenge Grant Program that will assess the effectiveness of the program. For grants awarded before July 1, 1998, the board shall develop an interim report to be submitted to the Legislature on or before March 1, 1999, and a final analysis of the grant program in a report to be submitted to the Legislature on or before March 1, 2001. For grants awarded after July 1, 1998, the board shall develop an interim report to be submitted to the Legislature on or before March 1, 2001, and a final analysis of the grant program in a report to be submitted to the Legislature on or before March 1, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 325, Sec. 4.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

749.27.

Funding for the Juvenile Crime Enforcement and Accountability Challenge Grant Program for grant awards made before July 1, 1998, shall be provided from the amount appropriated in Item 5430-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 1996. Up to 5 percent of the amount appropriated in Item 5430-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 1996 shall be transferred upon the approval of the Director of Finance, to Item 5430-001-0001 for expenditure as necessary for the board to administer this program, including technical assistance to counties and the development of an evaluation component.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 325, Sec. 5.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18.8. County Juvenile Correctional Facilities Act [749.3. - 749.33.]

749.3.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the County Juvenile Correctional Facilities Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

749.31.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) While the County Correctional Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1986 and the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Act of 1988 have provided ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) for county juvenile facilities for remodeling to help ensure health and safety requirements, many problems remain.

(b) Numerous county juvenile facilities throughout California are dilapidated and overcrowded and do not meet standards. Over 40 percent or 4,335 facility beds are in need of renovation, reconstruction, construction, and deferred maintenance.

(c) Capital improvements are necessary to protect the life and safety of the persons confined or employed in juvenile facilities and to upgrade the health and sanitary conditions of those facilities.

(d) Over two hundred twenty million dollars ($220,000,000) is needed to remodel, upgrade, or replace 4,335 beds by the year 2000.

(e) Due to fiscal constraints associated with the loss of local property tax revenues, counties are unable to finance the construction of adequate juvenile facilities.

(f) Local juvenile facilities are operating over capacity or must implement emergency release procedures, and the population of these facilities is still increasing. It is essential to the public safety that construction proceed as expeditiously as possible to relieve overcrowding and to maintain public safety and security.

(g) County juvenile facilities are threatened with closure or the imposition of court ordered sanctions if health and safety deficiencies are not corrected immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

749.32.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “County juvenile facilities” means county juvenile halls or camps.

(b) “Board” means the Board of Corrections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

749.33.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys may be available to the board for the purpose of awarding grants on a competitive basis to counties for the renovation, reconstruction, construction, completion of construction, and replacement of county juvenile facilities, and the performance of deferred maintenance on county juvenile facilities. However, deferred maintenance for facilities shall only include items with a useful life of at least 10 years. Up to 112 percent of these moneys may be used by the board for administration of this article.

(b) No grant shall be awarded pursuant to this article unless the applicant makes available resources in an amount equal to at least 25 percent of the amount of the grant. Resources may include in-kind contributions from participating agencies, but in no event shall the applicant’s cash contribution be less than 10 percent of the grant.

(c) An application for funds shall be in the manner and form prescribed by the board and pursuant to recommendations of an allocation advisory committee appointed by the board. From these recommendations, an allocation plan shall be developed and adopted by the board. The allocation advisory committee shall convene upon notification by the board.

(d) Any application for funds shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Documentation of need for the project or projects.

(2) Adoption of a formal county plan to finance construction of the proposed project or projects.

(3) Submittal of a preliminary staffing plan for the project or projects.

(4) Submittal of architectural drawings, which shall be approved by the board for compliance with minimum juvenile detention facility standards and which shall also be approved by the State Fire Marshal for compliance with fire and life safety requirements.

(5) Documentation that the facilities will be safely staffed and operated in compliance with law, including applicable regulations of the board.

(e) The board shall not be deemed a responsible agency, as defined in Section 21069 of the Public Resources Code, or otherwise be subject to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) for any activities undertaken or funded pursuant to this title. This subdivision does not exempt any local agency from the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 499, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18.9. Juvenile Justice Community Reentry Challenge Grant Program [749.5. - 749.95.]

749.5.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Juvenile Justice Community Reentry Challenge Grant Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 69, Sec. 35.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

749.6.

It is the intent of the Legislature to support the systematic and cultural transformation of the Division of Juvenile Justice into a rehabilitative model that improves youthful offender outcomes and reduces recidivism. As a key component of meeting these goals, it is further the intent of the Legislature to support the development of local infrastructure that provides comprehensive reentry services for juvenile parolees. These services shall be complementary to, and consistent with, the long-term objective of providing a continuum of state and local responses to juvenile delinquency that enhance public safety and improve offender outcomes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 69, Sec. 35.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

749.7.

(a) The Juvenile Justice Community Reentry Challenge Grant Program shall be administered by the Division of Juvenile Justice, in consultation with the Corrections Standards Authority, for the purpose of improving the performance and cost-effectiveness of postcustodial reentry supervision of juvenile parolees, reducing the recidivism rates of juvenile offenders, and piloting innovative reentry programs consistent with the division’s focus on a rehabilitative treatment model.

(b) This program shall award grants on a competitive basis to applicants that demonstrate a collaborative and comprehensive approach to the successful community reintegration of juvenile parolees, through the provision of wrap-around services that may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Transitional or step-down housing, including, but not limited to, group homes subject to Section 18987.62.

(2) Occupational development and job placement.

(3) Outpatient mental health services.

(4) Substance abuse treatment services.

(5) Education.

(6) Life skills counseling.

(7) Restitution and community service.

(8) Case management.

(9) Intermediate sanctions for technical violations of conditions of parole.

(c) To be eligible for consideration, applicants shall submit a program plan that includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) The target population.

(2) The type of housing and wrap-around services provided.

(3) A parole and community reentry plan for each parolee.

(4) Potential sanctions for a parolee’s failure to observe the conditions of the program.

(5) Coordination with local probation and other law enforcement agencies.

(6) Coordination with other service providers and community partners.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 69, Sec. 35.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

749.8.

(a) The Division of Juvenile Justice, in consultation with the Corrections Standards Authority, shall award grants that provide funding for three years on a competitive basis to counties and nonprofit organizations.

(b) A minimum of 75 percent of the grant award shall be for providing program services to individuals on parole from the Division of Juvenile Justice. The remainder of the grant award may additionally be used for providing program services to youthful offenders under the jurisdiction of the county or local juvenile court who are transitioning from out-of-home placements back into the community.

(c) The division shall award grants in a manner that maximizes the development of meaningful and innovative local programs to provide comprehensive reentry services for juvenile parolees.

(d) For any grant award, the division shall work with the juvenile court and the probation department of the county or counties in the grant service area to identify state and local case supervision responsibilities that are appropriate for the effective operation and management of the reentry programs supported by the grant. These responsibilities shall be incorporated into a case supervision plan for the grant that shall describe the role of local courts and probation departments in facilitating individual reentry plans, in assigning or removing parolees from grant-funded programs, and in meeting evaluation criteria for the grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 69, Sec. 35.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

749.9.

The Division of Juvenile Justice, in consultation with the Corrections Standards Authority, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and experts in the field of California juvenile justice programs, shall establish minimum standards, funding schedules, and procedures for awarding grants, which shall take into consideration, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) The size of the eligible population.

(b) A demonstrated ability to administer the program.

(c) A demonstrated ability to develop and provide a collaborative approach to improving parolee success rates that includes the participation of nonprofit and community partners.

(d) A demonstrated ability to provide comprehensive services to support improved parolee outcomes, including housing, training, and treatment.

(e) A demonstrated ability to provide effective oversight and management of youthful offenders or young adults who have been committed to a detention facility, and parolees that require reentry supervision and control.

(f) A demonstrated history of maximizing federal, state, local, and private funding sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 69, Sec. 35.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

749.95.

(a) Each grant recipient shall be required to establish and track outcome measures, including, but not limited to:

(1) Annual recidivism rates, including technical parole violations and new offenses.

(2) The number and percent of participants successfully completing parole.

(3) The number and percent of participants engaged in part-time or full-time employment, enrolled in higher education or vocational training, receiving drug and substance abuse treatment, or receiving mental health treatment.

(4) The number and percent of participants that obtain stable housing, including the type of housing.

(b) The Division of Juvenile Justice, in consultation with the Corrections Standards Authority, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and experts in the field of California juvenile justice programs, shall create an evaluation design for the Juvenile Justice Community Reentry Challenge Grant Program that will assess the effectiveness of the program. The division shall develop an interim report to be submitted to the Legislature on or before March 1, 2009, and a final analysis of the grant program in a report to be submitted to the Legislature on or before March 1, 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 69, Sec. 35.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 19. Wards—Transfer of Cases Between Counties [750. - 755.]

750.

Whenever a petition is filed in the juvenile court of a county other than the residence of the person named in the petition, or whenever, subsequent to the filing of a petition in the juvenile court of the county where such minor resides, the residence of the person who would be legally entitled to the custody of such minor were it not for the existence of a court order issued pursuant to this chapter is changed to another county, the entire case may be transferred to the juvenile court of the county wherein such person then resides at any time after the court has made a finding of the facts upon which it has exercised its jurisdiction over such minor, and the juvenile court of the county wherein such person then resides shall take jurisdiction of the case upon the receipt and filing with it of such finding of the facts and an order transferring the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 606.)
-------------------------------------------

751.

The expense of the transfer and all expenses in connection with the transfer and for the support and maintenance of such person shall be paid from the county treasury of the court ordering the transfer until the receipt and filing of the finding and order of transfer in the juvenile court of the transferee county.

The judge shall inquire into the financial condition of such person and of the parent, parents, guardian, or other person charged with his support and maintenance, and if he finds such person, parent, parents, guardian, or other person able, in whole or in part, to pay the expense of such transfer, he shall make a further order requiring such person, parent, parents, guardian, or other person to repay to the county such part, or all, of such expense of transfer as, in the opinion of the court, is proper. Such repayment shall be made to the probation officer who shall keep suitable accounts of such expenses and repayments and shall deposit all such collections in the county treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 606.)
-------------------------------------------

752.

Whenever a case is transferred as provided in Section 750, a certified copy of the file may be made and forwarded to the county where the person resides and shall include the name and address of the legal residence of the parent or guardian of the minor. A certified copy shall be deemed to be the same as the original. The original court file may be kept in the files of the transferring county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 205, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

753.

Whenever an order of transfer from another county is filed with the clerk of any juvenile court, the clerk shall place the transfer order on the calendar of the court, and it shall have precedence over all actions and civil proceedings not specifically given precedence by other provisions of law and shall be heard by the court at the earliest possible moment following the filing of the order.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

754.

In any action under the provisions of this article in which the residence of a minor person is determined, both the county in which the court is situated and any other county which, as a result of the determination of residence, might be determined to be the county of residence of the minor person, shall be considered to be parties in the action and shall have the right to appeal any order by which residence of the minor person is determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

755.

(a) A person placed on probation by the juvenile court or adjudged to be a ward of the juvenile court may be permitted by order of the court to reside in a county other than the county of their legal residence, and the court shall retain jurisdiction over that person.

(b) If a ward of the juvenile court is permitted to reside in a county other than the county of their legal residence, the ward may be placed under the supervision of the probation officer of the county of actual residence, with the consent of the probation officer. The ward shall comply with the instructions of
 the probation officer and upon failure to do so shall be returned to the county of their legal residence for further hearing and order of the court.

(c) This section applies to wards discharged to probation supervision pursuant to Section 875.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 73.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20. Wards—Modification of Juvenile Court Judgments and Orders [775. - 788.]

775.

Any order made by the court in the case of any person subject to its jurisdiction may at any time be changed, modified, or set aside, as the judge deems meet and proper, subject to such procedural requirements as are imposed by this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

776.

No order changing, modifying, or setting aside a previous order of the juvenile court shall be made either in chambers, or otherwise, unless prior notice of the application therefor has been given by the judge or the clerk of the court to the probation officer and prosecuting attorney and to the minor’s counsel of record, or, if there is no counsel of record, to the minor and his parent or guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1241.)
-------------------------------------------

777.

An order changing or modifying a previous order by removing a minor from the physical custody of a parent, guardian, relative, or friend and directing placement in a foster home, or commitment to a private institution or commitment to a county institution, or an order changing or modifying a previous order by directing commitment to the Youth Authority shall be made only after a noticed hearing.

(a) The notice shall be made as follows:

(1) By the probation officer where a minor has been declared a ward of the court or a probationer under Section 601 in the original matter and shall contain a concise statement
 of facts sufficient to support the conclusion that the minor has violated an order of the court.

(2) By the probation officer or the prosecuting attorney if the minor is a court ward or probationer under Section 602 in the original matter and the notice alleges a violation of a condition of probation not amounting to a crime. The notice shall contain a concise statement of facts sufficient to support this conclusion.

(3) Where the probation officer is the petitioner pursuant to paragraph (2), prior to the attachment of jeopardy at the time of the jurisdictional hearing, the prosecuting attorney may make a motion to dismiss the notice and may request that the matter be referred to the probation officer for whatever action the prosecuting or probation officer may deem
 appropriate.

(b) Upon the filing of such notice, the clerk of the juvenile court shall immediately set the same for hearing within 30 days, and the probation officer shall cause notice of it to be served upon the persons and in the manner prescribed by Sections 658 and 660. Service under this subdivision may be by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(c) The facts alleged in the notice shall be established by a preponderance of the evidence at a hearing to change, modify, or set aside a previous order. The court may admit and consider reliable hearsay evidence at the hearing to the same extent that such evidence would be admissible in an adult probation revocation hearing, pursuant to the decision in People v. Brown, 215 Cal.App.3d (1989) and any other relevant
 provision of law.

(d) An order for the detention of the minor pending adjudication of the alleged violation may be made only after a hearing is conducted pursuant to Article 15 (commencing with Section 625) of this chapter. Service under this subdivision may be by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5, but only in addition to other forms of service required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 143.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Note: This section was amended on March 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

778.

(a) (1) Any parent or other person having an interest in a child who is a ward of the juvenile court or the child himself or herself through a properly appointed guardian may, upon grounds of change of circumstance or new evidence, petition the court in the same action in which the child was found to be a ward of the juvenile court for a hearing to change, modify, or set aside any order of court previously made or to terminate the jurisdiction of the court. The petition shall be verified and, if made by a person other than the child, shall state the petitioner’s relationship to or interest in the child and shall set forth in concise language any change of circumstance or new evidence which are alleged to require such change
 of order or termination of jurisdiction.

(2) If it appears that the best interests of the child may be promoted by the proposed change of order or termination of jurisdiction, the court shall order that a hearing be held and shall give prior notice, or cause prior notice to be given, to such persons and by such means as prescribed by Sections 776 and 779, by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5, and, in such instances as the means of giving notice is not prescribed by such sections, then by such means as the court prescribes.

(b) (1) Any person, including a ward, a transition dependent, or a nonminor dependent of the juvenile court, may petition the court to assert a relationship as a sibling related by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common
 legal or biological parent to a child who is, or is the subject of a petition for adjudication as, a ward of the juvenile court, and may request visitation with the ward, placement with or near the ward, or consideration when determining or implementing a case plan or permanent plan for the ward.

(2) A ward, transition dependent, or nonminor dependent of the juvenile court may petition the court to assert a relationship as a sibling related by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent to a child who is in the physical custody of a common legal or biological parent, and may request visitation with the nondependent sibling in parental custody.

(3) Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16002, a request for sibling visitation may be granted unless it is
 determined by the court that sibling visitation is contrary to the safety and well-being of any of the siblings.

(4) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to file the petition
 for a ward asserting a sibling relationship pursuant to this subdivision if the court determines that the appointment is necessary for the best interests of the ward. The petition shall be verified and shall set forth the following:

(A) Through which parent he or she is related to the sibling.

(B) Whether he or she is related to the sibling by blood, adoption, or affinity.

(C) The request or order that the petitioner is seeking.

(D) Why that request or order is in the best interest of the ward.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 144.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

779.

The court committing a ward to the Youth Authority may thereafter change, modify, or set aside the order of commitment. Ten days’ notice of the hearing of the application therefor shall be served upon the Director of the Youth Authority. In changing, modifying, or setting aside the order of commitment, the court shall give due consideration to the effect thereof upon the discipline and parole system of the Youth Authority or of the correctional school in which the ward may have been placed by the Youth Authority. Except as provided in this section, nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to interfere with the system of parole and discharge now or hereafter established by law, or by rule of the Youth Authority, for the
 parole and discharge of wards of the juvenile court committed to the Youth Authority, or with the management of any school, institution, or facility under the jurisdiction of the Youth Authority. Except as provided in this section, this chapter does not interfere with the system of transfer between institutions and facilities under the jurisdiction of the Youth Authority. This section does not limit the authority of the court to change, modify, or set aside an order of commitment after a noticed hearing and upon a showing of good cause that the Youth Authority is unable to, or failing to, provide treatment consistent with Section 734.

However, before any inmate of a correctional school may be transferred to a state hospital, he or she shall first be returned to a court of competent jurisdiction and, after hearing, may be committed to a state hospital for the
 insane in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 145.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

779.5.

The court committing a ward to a secure youth treatment facility as provided in Section 875 may thereafter modify or set aside the order of commitment upon the written application of the ward or the probation department and upon a showing of good cause that the county or the commitment facility has failed, or is unable to, provide the ward with treatment, programming, and education that are consistent with the individual rehabilitation plan described in subdivision (d) of Section 875, that the conditions under which the ward is confined are harmful to the ward, or that the juvenile justice goals of rehabilitation and community safety are no longer served by continued confinement of the ward in a secure youth treatment facility. The court shall notice a hearing in which it shall hear any evidence from the ward, the probation
 department, and any behavioral health or other specialists having information relevant to consideration of the request to modify or set aside the order of commitment. The court shall, at the conclusion of the hearing, make its findings on the record, including findings as to the custodial and supervision status of the ward, based on the evidence presented.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 18, Sec. 11.   (SB 92)   Effective May 14, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

780.

If any person who has been committed to the Youth Authority appears to be an improper person to be received by or retained in any institution or facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of the Youth Authority or to be so incorrigible or so incapable of reformation under the discipline of any institution or facility under the jurisdiction of the department as to render his or her retention detrimental to the interests of the department, the department may order the return of that person to the committing court. However, the return of any person to the committing court does not relieve the department of any of its duties or responsibilities under the original commitment, and that commitment continues in full force and effect until it is vacated, modified, or set aside by order of the court.

If any person is returned to the committing court, his or her transportation shall be made, and the compensation therefor paid, as provided for the order of commitment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 3.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

781.

(a) (1) (A) If a petition has been filed with a juvenile court to commence proceedings to adjudge a person a ward of the court, if a person is cited to appear before a probation officer or is taken before a probation officer pursuant to Section 626, or if a minor is taken before any officer of a law enforcement agency, the person or the county probation officer may, five years or more after the jurisdiction of the juvenile court has terminated as to the person, or, if a petition is not filed, five years or more after the person was cited to appear before a probation officer or was taken before a probation officer pursuant to Section 626 or was taken before any officer of a law enforcement agency, or, in any case
 at any time after the person has reached 18 years of age, petition the court for sealing of the records, including records of arrest, relating to the person’s case, in the custody of the juvenile court and probation officer and any other agencies, including law enforcement agencies, entities, and public officials as the petitioner alleges, in the petition, to have custody of the records. Defense counsel for the minor shall not be ordered to seal their records. The court shall notify the district attorney of the county and the county probation officer, if they are not the petitioner, and the district attorney or probation officer or any of their deputies or any other person having relevant evidence may testify at the hearing on the petition. If, after hearing, the court finds that since the termination of jurisdiction or action pursuant to Section 626, as the case may be, the person has not been
 convicted of a felony or of any misdemeanor involving moral turpitude and that
 rehabilitation has been attained to the satisfaction of the court, it shall order all records, papers, and exhibits in the person’s case in the custody of the juvenile court sealed, including the juvenile court record, minute book entries, and entries on dockets, and any other records relating to the case in the custody of the other agencies, entities, and officials as are named in the order. Once the court has ordered the person’s records sealed, the proceedings in the case shall be deemed never to have occurred, and the person may properly reply accordingly to any inquiry about the events, the records of which are ordered sealed.

(B) The court shall send a copy of the order to each agency, entity, and official named in the order, directing the agency or entity to seal its records. Each agency, entity, and official shall seal
 the records in its custody as directed by the order, shall advise the court of its compliance, and thereupon shall seal the copy of the court’s order for sealing of records that the agency, entity, or official received.
